Utah statutes.
78B-6-1306.   Termination of title pending action -- Judgment -- Damages.

If the plaintiff demonstrates a right to recover at the time the action is brought, but his right terminates during the pendency of the action, the verdict and judgment shall be according to the fact, and the plaintiff may recover damages for withholding the property.

